Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 7
ANNEXATION

32-11-701. Annexation of lands to district.

The territorial limits of the urban district may be enlarged by the annexation of additional real property thereto in the following ways:

By petition and consent of the fee owner pursuant to sections 32-11-702 and 32-11-706;

By petition of the taxpaying electors, and approval pursuant to sections 32-11-703, 32-11-704, and 32-11-706; and

By action initiated by the urban district pursuant to sections 32-11-705 and 32-11-706.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 812, § 201.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-201.

L. 70:

p. 302, § 130.

32-11-702. Petition of fee owners.

The fee owner of any real property contiguous to the territorial limits of the district and capable of being served with facilities of the district may file with the board a petition in writing praying that such property be included in the district.

The petition shall set forth an accurate legal description of the property owned by the petitioners and shall state that assent to the annexation of such property in the district is given by the signers thereto, constituting all the fee owners of such property.

The petition must be acknowledged in the same manner required for conveyance of land.

There shall be no withdrawal from a petition after consideration by the board, nor shall further objections be filed except in case of fraud or misrepresentation.

The board shall hear the petition at an open meeting after the publication of a notice of the filing of such petition, and of the place, time, and date of such meeting, and of the names and addresses of the petitioners, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the real property proposed to be annexed is located.

The board shall determine if such annexation is feasible and in the best interests of the district.

If the board so determines, the board shall grant the petition.

If the petition is granted as to all or any of the real property therein described, the board shall by resolution make an order to that effect.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 812, § 202.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-202.

32-11-703. Petition of taxpaying electors.

Not less than ten percent or one hundred, whichever number is smaller, of the taxpaying electors of any real property which is contiguous to the district and contains twenty-five thousand or more square feet of land may file a petition with the board in writing praying that such area be annexed to the district; but no single tract or parcel or property, containing ten acres or more, may be included in any district without the consent of the owner thereof.

The petition shall describe the area to be annexed and shall be acknowledged in the same manner as conveyances of land are required to be acknowledged.

The secretary of the board shall cause notice of the filing of the petition to be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the property is situated.

The notice shall state:

The fact that such a petition has been filed;

The names of the petitioners;

The description of the area desired to be included;

The date and place of a hearing on the proposed annexation; and

A statement that all persons interested shall appear at the time and place stated in the notice and show cause in writing why the petition should not be granted.

There shall be no withdrawal from a petition after consideration by the board, nor shall further objections be filed except in case of fraud or misrepresentation.

The board, at the time and place mentioned in the notice, shall proceed to hear the petition and all written objections thereto.

The board shall determine if such annexation is feasible and in the best interests of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 813, § 203.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-203.

32-11-704. Annexation election.

If the petition filed under section 32-11-703 (1) is provisionally granted, the board by resolution shall:

Make an order to that effect;

Direct that the question of inclusion of the area within the district be submitted to the registered electors at an election held within the area to be included; and

Designate the designated election official, who shall give notice and conduct the election according to article 13.5 of title 1.

The designated election official shall prepare the ballot for any election under this part 7. The ballot must contain substantially the following words:

(insert description of area)

(insert description of conditions)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 917, § 182, effective January 1, 1993.)

If a majority of the votes cast on the question at the election favor inclusion, the board shall by resolution enter an order making the real property a part of the district.

"Shall the following described area become a part of the urban drainage and flood control district upon the following conditions, if any?

For inclusion __________
Against inclusion __________."

Source:

L. 69:

p. 813, § 204.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-204.

L. 70:

p. 303, § 131.

L. 71:

p. 965, § 16.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1627, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 917, § 182, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2018:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 18-025), ch. 22, p. 275, § 4, effective March 7.

32-11-705. Annexation initiated by board.

At any time as a condition to an annexation initiated by the board, it may determine by resolution that real property proposed for annexation:

Is contiguous to the territorial limits of the district;

Contains six hundred forty or more acres of land;

Has become urbanized by having a population of at least one thousand persons per square mile and having at least five hundred dwelling units per square mile; and

Is capable of being served with the facilities of the urban district.

Such a resolution shall provisionally order the annexation of such area.

The secretary of the board shall cause notice of the adoption of the provisional resolution to be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the property is situated.

The notice shall state:

The fact that such a provisional resolution has been adopted;

The description of the area desired to be included;

The date and place of a hearing on the proposed annexation; and

A statement that all persons interested shall appear at the time and place stated in the notice and show cause in writing why the annexation should not be made final.

The board, at the time and place mentioned in the notice, shall proceed to hear all written objections to the proposed annexation and all other matters in the premises.

The board shall determine by resolution if such annexation is feasible and in the best interest of the district.

If the board so determines, the secretary shall furnish by mail to the director of the division of local government within the department of local affairs, under the seal of the district, a copy of the provisional resolution and of the feasibility resolution and shall request the director to approve the annexation.

If the director approves the annexation in writing, the board, upon the receipt of such approval, may by resolution enter its order making the real property a part of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 814, § 205.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-205.

32-11-706. General provisions about annexations.

The failure of any person in the urban district or in the area to be annexed to file a written objection to any proposed annexation in a hearing of the board thereon shall be taken as an assent on such person's part to the inclusion in the district of the area described in the notice of the hearing for annexation.

The action of the board in its determination that any proposed annexation which it orders is feasible and to the best interests of the district shall be final, conclusive, and not subject to review.

Whenever the board by resolution enters an order annexing any real property to the urban district, the secretary of the board shall forthwith file the resolution:

With the secretary of state;

With the attorney general of the state;

With the division of local government; and

With each county clerk and recorder, county assessor, and county treasurer of the county or counties in which the annexed real property is located.

If an order is so entered annexing real property to the urban district, such order is deemed final. The entry of such order finally and conclusively establishes the annexation of the real property to the district against all persons except the state, in a proceeding in the nature of quo warranto, commenced by the attorney general within thirty days after the resolution entering such order is filed with him or her and not otherwise. Such an annexation shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding except as expressly authorized in this subsection (4).

After the date of the annexation of such real property to the urban district by the adoption of such resolution, the annexed property shall be liable for its proportionate share of existing bonded indebtedness of the district; but such real property shall not be liable for any taxes or service charges levied or assessed prior to the inclusion of such annexed property in the district, nor shall the entry of the property into the district be made subject to or contingent upon the payment or assumption of any penalty, toll, or charge, other than the taxes and service charges which are uniformly made, assessed, or levied for the entire district except as otherwise expressly provided in this article.

The urban district acting by and through the board and the owner of the real property sought to be annexed to the district may enter into an agreement with respect to the terms and conditions on which such property may be annexed.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 815, § 206.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-206.

L. 2016:

(4) amended, (HB 16-1094), ch. 94, p. 268, § 17, effective August 10.